District of Columbia statutes.
7-2507.10

Severability.

If any provision of this unit or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of this unit and the application of such provision to other persons not similarly situated or to other circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title VII, § 711, 23 DCR 2464

History

1981 Ed., § 6-2380.
1973 Ed., § 6-1880.

Prior Codifications